Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-885.44
Complaint for violations of act.

The commission by and
through its director may prefer a complaint for violation of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 44;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 29;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 12.